Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202526-107
Type of protection order.

A court may treat a petition for a domestic abuse, harassment, or sexual assault protection order as a petition for another of such types of protection order if it appears from the facts in the petition, affidavit, and evidence presented that such other type of protection order is more appropriate and if:

(1) The court makes specific findings that such other order is more appropriate; or

(2) The petitioner has requested the court to so treat the petition.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 7.